Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,109
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program; department; report.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall electronically submit a report to the Legislature on or before December 15 of each year beginning December 15, 2024, through December 15, 2034, on the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program which includes (1) the number of mothers served, (2) the services offered, and (3) the birth outcomes for each mother served.

Laws 2024, LB857, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB958, § 7.
July 18, 2026